North Carolina statutes. Chapter 32A. Powers of Attorney.
Article 5. Enforcement of Power of Attorney.

§§ 32A-40 through 32A-43.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018.

History.

G.S. 32A-40

; 2005-178, s. 1, repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018. G.S. 32A-41; 2005-178, s. 1, repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018. G.S. 32A-42; 2005-178, s. 1; 2006-264, s. 39(a), repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018. G.S. 32A-43: repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018.

Cross References.

For similar current provisions, see the North Carolina Uniform Power of Attorney Act,

G.S. 32C-1-101

et seq.

Editor’s Note.

The former numbers

G.S. 32A-40

through 32A-43 were assigned by the Revisor of Statutes, the numbers in Session Laws 2005-178, s. 1, having been

G.S. 32A-35

through 32A-38.

Former

G.S. 32A-40

pertained to the reliance on power of attorney. Former G.S. 32A-41 pertained to the penalty for unreasonable refusal to recognize power. Former G.S. 32A-42 pertained to the protection for third parties. Former G.S. 32A-43 pertained to the scope of Article.